Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-322.02
Sexual abuse of an inmate, parolee, probationer, or problem solving court participant in the first degree; penalty.

Any person who subjects an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant to sexual penetration in violation of section 28-322.01 is guilty of sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the first degree. Sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the first degree is a Class IIA felony.

Laws 1999, LB 511, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 10.
July 18, 2026
Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.

As used in this section, the word "subject" means to cause to undergo the action of something specified. State v. Loyuk, 289 Neb. 967, 857 N.W.2d 833 (2015).